Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska49-207
Amendments; more than one submitted; order of submission; form of ballot; duty of Secretary of State.

Whenever at a session of the Legislature more than one amendment to the Constitution or proposition is submitted to a vote of the people, it shall be the duty of the Secretary of State to provide the form of the ballots containing such propositions or proposed amendments, which are to be submitted to a vote of the people. The Secretary of State shall number the amendments consecutively in the order they are received from the Governor. If more than one amendment to the Constitution or proposition is received at the same time, they shall be submitted in the order they were approved by the Legislature.

Laws 1895, c. 5, § 1, p. 69;

R.S.1913, § 3704;

C.S.1922, § 3092;

C.S.1929, § 49-207;

R.S.1943, § 49-207;

Laws 1955, c. 191, § 1, p. 552.